Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-330
Ownership, possession, storage, transportation, sale, and transfer of firearms and other weapons; power of counties, cities, and villages; ordinance, permit, or regulation; null and void.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that the regulation of the ownership, possession, storage, transportation, sale, and transfer of firearms and other weapons is a matter of statewide concern.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any home rule charter, counties, cities, and villages shall not have the power to:

(a) Regulate the ownership, possession, storage, transportation, sale, or transfer of firearms or other weapons, except as expressly provided by state law; or

(b) Require registration of firearms or other weapons.

(3) Any county, city, or village ordinance, permit, or regulation in violation of subsection (2) of this section is declared to be null and void.

Laws 2009, LB430, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB817, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2022), § 18-1703;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 1.